Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-197
Nebraska Brand Inspection and Theft Prevention Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Brand Inspection and Theft Prevention Fund is created. Fees and money collected pursuant to the Livestock Brand Act not otherwise provided for in the act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be used by the Nebraska Brand Committee in the administration and enforcement of the act and section 54-415. All expenses and salaries provided for under such act or incurred by reason thereof shall be paid out of the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 28.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.